Texas, session 892, HB22.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 403.653(c), Government Code, as effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (c)  The fund may be used only for: (1)  a purpose described by Chapter 490I; (2)  providing funding for 9-1-1 and next generation 9-1-1 services under Chapter 771, Health and Safety Code; (3)  supporting the deployment of next generation 9-1-1 service, including its costs of equipment, operations, and administration, as provided by Section 771.0713, Health and Safety Code; (4)  supporting the Texas Broadband Pole Replacement Program established under Section 403.553 [403.503, as added by Chapter 659 (H.B. 1505), Acts of the 87th Legislature, Regular Session, 2021]; (5)  providing matching funds for federal money provided for the Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program; (6)  expanding access to broadband service in economically distressed communities to support increased connectivity needs in those areas; [and] (7)  supporting the deployment and operation, including by funding costs for equipment, operation, and administration, of: (A)  early warning and emergency systems to provide notifications of natural disasters and other emergencies; and (B)  interoperable emergency communication equipment and infrastructure; and (8)  administering and enforcing this subchapter. SECTION 2.  Section 490I.0106(d), Government Code, as amended by S.B. No. 1405, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (d)  In making an award under this section, the [The] office may not: (1)  except as provided by Section 490I.01062, favor a particular broadband technology in awarding contracts, grants, loans, or other financial incentives; (2)  award a contract, grant, loan, or other financial incentive for the deployment of last-mile broadband service to a noncommercial provider of broadband service for a broadband serviceable location if an eligible commercial provider of broadband service has submitted an application for the same location; (3)  take into consideration distributions from the state universal service fund established under Section 56.021, Utilities Code, when deciding to award contracts, grants, loans, or other financial incentives; or (4)  except as provided by Section 490I.01061, award a contract, grant, loan, or other financial incentive for deployment of last-mile broadband service for a location that is subject to an existing federal commitment to deploy qualifying broadband service on the date the application is submitted or during the application process. SECTION 3.  Chapter 490I, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 490I.01063 to read as follows: Sec. 490I.01063.  EMERGENCY COMMUNICATION PROGRAM. (a) The broadband development office may award contracts, grants, low-interest loans, and other financial incentives to support the deployment and operation of: (1)  early warning and emergency systems to provide notifications of natural disasters and other emergencies; and (2)  interoperable emergency communication equipment and infrastructure. (b)  In implementing this section, the office may coordinate with the office of the governor and the Texas Division of Emergency Management to support the implementation of interoperable communications programs under Chapter 421. (c)  An award granted under this section does not affect the eligibility of a telecommunications provider to receive support from the state universal service fund under Section 56.021, Utilities Code. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.